full_spanish.lexc
!!!spanish.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +1C +2C +3C +V +Sg +Pl +1P +2P +3P +Masculino +Feminino +Infinitivo +PresenteIndicativo +PreteritoImperfecto +PreteritoIndefinido +Futuro +Condicional +SubjuntivoPresente +SubjuntivoImperfecto +SubjuntivoPosesivo +SubjuntivoFuturo +Affirmativo +Gerundio +Participio +Infinitivo ll ch


LEXICON Root

Adj ;
Noun ;
Verb ;


########## LOS ADJETIVOS ######################################################
LEXICON Ainf

+A+Sg:^0 #;
+A+Pl:^s #;


########## LOS NOMBRES ########################################################
LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:^0 #;
+N+Pl:^s #;


########## LOS VERBOS #########################################################

LEXICON Adj
47 Ainf ;
7 Ainf ;
abertal Ainf ;
absentista Ainf ;
acaricida Ainf ;
achampañado Ainf ;
acondicionador Ainf ;
acrosómico Ainf ;
acuátil Ainf ;
adjetivador Ainf ;
aductor Ainf ;
afgano Ainf ;
aglutinante Ainf ;
agreste Ainf ;
albugíneo Ainf ;
alógeno Ainf ;
alopátrico Ainf ;
alusivo Ainf ;
ambulante Ainf ;
amontillado Ainf ;
anabático Ainf ;
andariego Ainf ;
anglo Ainf ;
anotador Ainf ;
anticlerical Ainf ;
antihiperglucemiante Ainf ;
antireflexivo Ainf ;
antropométrico Ainf ;
apasionante Ainf ;
aportante Ainf ;
araboberéber Ainf ;
argótico Ainf ;
arrendable Ainf ;
articulatorio Ainf ;
asimétrico Ainf ;
astronónico Ainf ;
atinente Ainf ;
atávico Ainf ;
automovilístico Ainf ;
bacteriano Ainf ;
barrenador Ainf ;
benjamita Ainf ;
bifronte Ainf ;
birrefringente Ainf ;
bollonado Ainf ;
braquiocefálico Ainf ;
cabañero Ainf ;
camagua Ainf ;
canular Ainf ;
carilargo Ainf ;
catalanohablante Ainf ;
cecal Ainf ;
cereal Ainf ;
chechenio Ainf ;
cierto Ainf ;
cisípedo Ainf ;
clínico Ainf ;
cognado Ainf ;
cominero Ainf ;
coñón Ainf ;
condriosomal Ainf ;
conjuntival Ainf ;
conteste Ainf ;
coplanario Ainf ;
correligionario Ainf ;
creador Ainf ;
cuadrilátero Ainf ;
cuneoescafoideo Ainf ;
declamatorio Ainf ;
delocutivo Ainf ;
dependiente Ainf ;
descendiente Ainf ;
deshidratador Ainf ;
despoblador Ainf ;
deyector Ainf ;
dieciochista Ainf ;
dipneo Ainf ;
distensible Ainf ;
domanial Ainf ;
ebionita Ainf ;
egiptológico Ainf ;
elefanciaco Ainf ;
emponzoñador Ainf ;
endodinamomorfo Ainf ;
ensamblador Ainf ;
epirota Ainf ;
escandente Ainf ;
esfenocigomático Ainf ;
espirador Ainf ;
estepario Ainf ;
estroboscópico Ainf ;
evitable Ainf ;
exhortante Ainf ;
extracraneal Ainf ;
falseador Ainf ;
femorotibial Ainf ;
filiforme Ainf ;
flagrante Ainf ;
fondón Ainf ;
fotoestático Ainf ;
frotador Ainf ;
funeral Ainf ;
galvanoplástico Ainf ;
genicular Ainf ;
gigantesco Ainf ;
gobernante Ainf ;
gravable Ainf ;
guedejoso Ainf ;
harmonioso Ainf ;
heptabarbital Ainf ;
heurístico Ainf ;
hipereutectoide Ainf ;
hocicudo Ainf ;
horadable Ainf ;
huraño Ainf ;
iliturgitano Ainf ;
imponderable Ainf ;
inalterable Ainf ;
incoloro Ainf ;
incudomalear Ainf ;
indigestible Ainf ;
inexcusable Ainf ;
ingresivo Ainf ;
inmunoglobulínico Ainf ;
inspirativo Ainf ;
intercambiador Ainf ;
intermolecular Ainf ;
intramolecular Ainf ;
ionizante Ainf ;
isoalotípico Ainf ;
jacarero Ainf ;
juglaresco Ainf ;
lagañoso Ainf ;
laudatorio Ainf ;
leucocitoide Ainf ;
limonero Ainf ;
lluvioso Ainf ;
lugareño Ainf ;
macrópodo Ainf ;
maliciable Ainf ;
manubrioesternal Ainf ;
matizable Ainf ;
mediotarsiano Ainf ;
menfita Ainf ;
mesopotámico Ainf ;
micótico Ainf ;
misional Ainf ;
molitivo Ainf ;
monomaxilar Ainf ;
morfológico Ainf ;
mulato Ainf ;
munificente Ainf ;
natalicio Ainf ;
neolatino Ainf ;
nigeriano Ainf ;
notariado Ainf ;
obrerista Ainf ;
odontinoide Ainf ;
ondulatorio Ainf ;
orgástico Ainf ;
ostial Ainf ;
pajarero Ainf ;
pancho Ainf ;
parafraseador Ainf ;
parisién Ainf ;
patinador Ainf ;
pelícano Ainf ;
peor Ainf ;
perjuro Ainf ;
petrofaríngeo Ainf ;
pintojo Ainf ;
platínico Ainf ;
polaco Ainf ;
poliétnico Ainf ;
portal Ainf ;
practicante Ainf ;
pregonero Ainf ;
presidencialista Ainf ;
productivista Ainf ;
proposicional Ainf ;
prístino Ainf ;
pulsativo Ainf ;
quincenario Ainf ;
raedor Ainf ;
recambiable Ainf ;
recusante Ainf ;
regatón Ainf ;
remontante Ainf ;
residuario Ainf ;
retromolar Ainf ;
rijador Ainf ;
romboideo Ainf ;
rutinario Ainf ;
saltón Ainf ;
sardicense Ainf ;
sedicente Ainf ;
semi-invertido Ainf ;
sepultador Ainf ;
sicoanalítico Ainf ;
sindicalista Ainf ;
sobreescribible Ainf ;
sonante Ainf ;
subcampeón Ainf ;
subtropical Ainf ;
sumatorio Ainf ;
supraglótico Ainf ;
taborita Ainf ;
tatuador Ainf ;
tembladero Ainf ;
termocroico Ainf ;
tetánico Ainf ;
tintóreo Ainf ;
torcedero Ainf ;
tranquilizante Ainf ;
tranviario Ainf ;
travesío Ainf ;
trifoliolado Ainf ;
troncal Ainf ;
turonense Ainf ;
unifoliado Ainf ;
vacilante Ainf ;
vasoconstrictor Ainf ;
verdadero Ainf ;
videomagnético Ainf ;
vitamínico Ainf ;
xenomórfico Ainf ;
zancudo Ainf ;
zuro Ainf ;
LEXICON Noun
abofeteamiento Ninf ;
abultamiento Ninf ;
acercamiento Ninf ;
acémila Ninf ;
activo Ninf ;
adiestrador Ninf ;
aductor Ninf ;
afghani Ninf ;
agnación Ninf ;
ahuehué Ninf ;
alavense Ninf ;
alcano Ninf ;
alelotipo Ninf ;
alianza Ninf ;
almohadillado Ninf ;
altiplanicie Ninf ;
ambón Ninf ;
amortiguamiento Ninf ;
andradita Ninf ;
animalada Ninf ;
antiacadémico Ninf ;
antipirético Ninf ;
apandillamiento Ninf ;
apologista Ninf ;
apure Ninf ;
argumentación Ninf ;
arrate Ninf ;
arteriosclerosis Ninf ;
asiduidad Ninf ;
atacador Ninf ;
atolladero Ninf ;
aurosoma Ninf ;
automática Ninf ;
avemaría Ninf ;
azulete Ninf ;
balaje Ninf ;
banderilla Ninf ;
barbour Ninf ;
barrica Ninf ;
batial Ninf ;
beliceño Ninf ;
bígaro Ninf ;
binodo Ninf ;
birlonga Ninf ;
bólido Ninf ;
bolardo Ninf ;
bosón Ninf ;
brancal Ninf ;
brochada Ninf ;
bufador Ninf ;
busto Ninf ;
cabritilla Ninf ;
cagarruta Ninf ;
calderería Ninf ;
camandulería Ninf ;
canastilla Ninf ;
cantazo Ninf ;
capitulación Ninf ;
carbonero Ninf ;
carioca Ninf ;
carril Ninf ;
casilla Ninf ;
catervario Ninf ;
cayo Ninf ;
celidonia Ninf ;
centralización Ninf ;
cerrilidad Ninf ;
chancleta Ninf ;
charrán Ninf ;
chinchoso Ninf ;
choto Ninf ;
cicatrización Ninf ;
cilindrado Ninf ;
cintarazo Ninf ;
citronelal Ninf ;
clintonita Ninf ;
cánon Ninf ;
codeso Ninf ;
coito Ninf ;
colénquima Ninf ;
comisionista Ninf ;
compulsión Ninf ;
concusionario Ninf ;
confidencialidad Ninf ;
conjuntiva Ninf ;
contal Ninf ;
contraclave Ninf ;
contrarresto Ninf ;
copiloto Ninf ;
cordón Ninf ;
corte Ninf ;
crescendo Ninf ;
cruceta Ninf ;
cuádriceps Ninf ;
damalisco Ninf ;
dejo Ninf ;
desagregación Ninf ;
descompaginación Ninf ;
desgranadora Ninf ;
desnutrición Ninf ;
desunción Ninf ;
didactismo Ninf ;
diplomático Ninf ;
distributividad Ninf ;
drama Ninf ;
ectropión Ninf ;
electronistagmograma Ninf ;
empalizada Ninf ;
encestador Ninf ;
enjaretado Ninf ;
entrecorteza Ninf ;
equipartición Ninf ;
escasero Ninf ;
escupidor Ninf ;
espetera Ninf ;
estafilococo Ninf ;
estramonio Ninf ;
eurodólar Ninf ;
exotropía Ninf ;
falisco Ninf ;
fenilmetiletanolamina Ninf ;
filomena Ninf ;
flojeo Ninf ;
fosfotioato Ninf ;
frontispicio Ninf ;
galactofagia Ninf ;
garrancho Ninf ;
geotecnia Ninf ;
glotonería Ninf ;
grafioles Ninf ;
guardabarrera Ninf ;
habón Ninf ;
hematocitoblasto Ninf ;
heteronimia Ninf ;
hinchada Ninf ;
h Ninf ;
hostiero Ninf ;
igualación Ninf ;
incomunicado Ninf ;
inflamabilidad Ninf ;
integrina Ninf ;
invertido Ninf ;
isosilabismo Ninf ;
joya Ninf ;
lactato Ninf ;
latifundio Ninf ;
leoncillo Ninf ;
ligroína Ninf ;
liviandad Ninf ;
lucidez Ninf ;
madam Ninf ;
maltusiano Ninf ;
manquera Ninf ;
masajista Ninf ;
medallón Ninf ;
mensura Ninf ;
metilación Ninf ;
microimagen Ninf ;
miopía Ninf ;
molienda Ninf ;
morbididad Ninf ;
muchachería Ninf ;
nacrita Ninf ;
neoliberal Ninf ;
nitrometano Ninf ;
numerador Ninf ;
ofertorio Ninf ;
operatividad Ninf ;
ortogonalización Ninf ;
paca Ninf ;
palmesano Ninf ;
papi Ninf ;
parrón Ninf ;
pavón Ninf ;
pelillo Ninf ;
perezoso Ninf ;
peryodato Ninf ;
pinchito Ninf ;
planchista Ninf ;
pluriempleo Ninf ;
politicastro Ninf ;
portaviones Ninf ;
predominación Ninf ;
primichón Ninf ;
prosista Ninf ;
publicismo Ninf ;
purín Ninf ;
quimotripsina Ninf ;
radiometeorología Ninf ;
rasuración Ninf ;
recibidor Ninf ;
reestructuración Ninf ;
relumbro Ninf ;
requemamiento Ninf ;
retoño Ninf ;
ribeteado Ninf ;
romanador Ninf ;
rumanita Ninf ;
salero Ninf ;
sapotácea Ninf ;
sedimentología Ninf ;
seo Ninf ;
sherry Ninf ;
sintonización Ninf ;
sobreprecio Ninf ;
somatotropina Ninf ;
suavizador Ninf ;
subvoltaje Ninf ;
surafricano Ninf ;
talgo Ninf ;
teflón Ninf ;
tenedero Ninf ;
tertuliano Ninf ;
tiesto Ninf ;
tálamo Ninf ;
tornasol Ninf ;
transdiferenciación Ninf ;
travestí Ninf ;
trifosfato Ninf ;
trompo Ninf ;
tusco Ninf ;
vagón Ninf ;
vatihorímetro Ninf ;
verificadora Ninf ;
violetero Ninf ;
vulgarizador Ninf ;
yudogui Ninf ;
zoolatría Ninf ;
